California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 29.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4369.3.

In designing and developing the overall program, the office shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop a statewide plan to address gambling disorders.

(b) Adopt any regulations necessary to administer the program.

(c) Develop priorities for funding services and criteria for distributing program funds.

(d) Monitor the expenditures of state funds by agencies and organizations receiving program funding.

(e) Evaluate the effectiveness of services
 provided through the program. The department is authorized to contract with academic experts to perform these evaluations.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any contracts required to meet the requirements of this chapter are exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and are exempt from the approval of the Department of General Services.

(g) Administrative costs for the program may not exceed 10 percent of the total funding budgeted for the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 30.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4369.4.

All state agencies, including, but not limited to, the California Horse Racing Board, the California Gambling Control Commission, the Department of Justice, and any other agency that regulates casino gambling or cardrooms within the state, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the California State Lottery, shall coordinate with the office to ensure that state programs take into account, as much as practicable, gambling disorders. The office shall also coordinate and work with other entities involved in gambling and the treatment of gambling disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 31.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. SCHOOL-BASED EARLY MENTAL HEALTH INTERVENTION AND PREVENTION SERVICES FOR CHILDREN ACT [4370. - 4390.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [4370. - 4372.]

4370.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the School-based Early Mental Health Intervention and Prevention Services for Children Act of 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 757, Sec. 1.   Effective October 9, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4371.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Each year in California over 65,000 teenagers become adolescent mothers and 230 teenagers commit suicide. Each year more than 20 percent of California’s teenagers drop out of high school.

(b) Thirty percent of California’s elementary school pupils experience school adjustment problems, many of which are evident the first four years of school, that is, kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(c) Problems that our children experience, whether in school or at home, that remain undetected and untreated grow and manifest themselves in all areas of their later lives.

(d) There is a clear relationship between early adjustment problems and later adolescent problems, including, but not limited to, poor school attendance, low achievement, delinquency, drug abuse, and high school dropout rates. In many cases, signs of these problems can be detected in the early grades.

(e) It is in California’s best interest, both in economic and human terms, to identify and treat the minor difficulties that our children are experiencing before those difficulties become major barriers to later success. It is far more humane and cost-effective to make a small investment in early mental health intervention and prevention services now and avoid larger costs, including, but not limited to, foster care, group home placement, intensive special education services, mental health treatment, or probation supervised care.

(f) Programs like the Primary Intervention Program and the San Diego Unified Counseling Program for Children have proven very effective in helping children adjust to the school environment and learn more effective coping skills that in turn result in better school achievement, increased attendance, and increased self-esteem.

(g) To create the optimum learning environment for our children, schools, teachers, parents, public and private service providers, and community-based organizations must enter into locally appropriate cooperative agreements to ensure that all pupils will receive the benefits of school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services that are designed to meet their personal, social, and educational needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 22.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4372.

For the purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Cooperating entity” means any federal, state, or local, public or private nonprofit agency providing school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services that agrees to offer services at a schoolsite through a program assisted under this part.

(b) “Eligible pupil” means a pupil who attends a publicly funded elementary school and who is in kindergarten or grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(c) “Local educational agency” means any school district or county office of education, or state special school.

(d) “Director” means the State Director of Mental Health.

(e) “Supportive service” means a service that will enhance the mental health and social development of children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 23.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. School-Based Early Mental Health Intervention and Prevention Services Matching Grant Program [4380. - 4383.]

4380.

Subject to the availability of funding each year, the Legislature authorizes the director, in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, to award matching grants to local educational agencies to pay the state share of the costs of providing programs that provide school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services to eligible pupils at schoolsites of eligible pupils, as follows:

(a) The director shall award matching grants pursuant to this chapter to local educational agencies throughout the state.

(b) Matching grants awarded under this part shall be awarded for a period of not more than three years and no
 single schoolsite shall be awarded more than one grant, except for a schoolsite that received a grant prior to July 1, 1992.

(c) The director shall pay to each local educational agency having an application approved pursuant to requirements in this part the state share of the cost of the activities described in the application.

(d) Commencing July 1, 1993, the state share of matching grants shall be a maximum of 50 percent in each of the three years.

(e) Commencing July 1, 1993, the local share of matching grants shall be at least 50 percent, from a combination of school district and cooperating entity funds.

(f) The local share of the matching grant may be in cash or payment in-kind.

(g) Priority shall be given to those applicants that demonstrate the following:

(1) The local educational agency will serve the greatest number of eligible pupils from low-income families.

(2) The local educational agency will provide a strong parental involvement component.

(3) The local educational agency will provide supportive services with one or more cooperating entities.

(4) The local educational agency will provide services at a low cost per child served in the project.

(5) The local educational agency will provide programs and services that are based on adoption or modification, or both, of existing programs that have been shown to be effective. No more than 20
 percent of the grants awarded by the director may be utilized for new models.

(6) The local educational agency will provide services to children who are in out-of-home placement or who are at risk of being in out-of-home placement.

(h) Eligible supportive services may include the following:

(1) Individual and group intervention and prevention services.

(2) Parent involvement through conferences or training, or both.

(3) Teacher and staff conferences and training related to meeting project goals.

(4) Referral to outside resources when eligible pupils require additional services.

(5) Use of paraprofessional staff, who are trained and supervised by credentialed school psychologists, school counselors, or school social workers, to meet with pupils on a short-term weekly basis, in a one-on-one setting as in the primary intervention program established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4343) of Part 3. A minimum of 80 percent of the grants awarded by the director shall include the basic components of the primary intervention program.

(6) Any other service or activity that will improve the mental health of eligible pupils.

Prior to participation by an eligible pupil in either individual or group services, consent of a parent or guardian shall be obtained.

(i) Each local educational agency seeking a grant under this chapter shall submit an
 application to the director at the time, in a manner, and accompanied by any information the director may reasonably require.

(j) Each matching grant application submitted shall include all of the following:

(1) Documentation of need for the school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services.

(2) A description of the school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services expected to be provided at the schoolsite.

(3) A statement of program goals.

(4) A list of cooperating entities that will participate in the provision of services. A letter from each cooperating entity confirming its participation in the provision of services shall be included with the
 list. At least one letter shall be from a cooperating entity confirming that it will agree to screen referrals of low-income children the program has determined may be in need of mental health treatment services and that, if the cooperating entity determines that the child is in need of those services and if the cooperating entity determines that according to its priority process the child is eligible to be served by it, the cooperating entity will agree to provide those mental health treatment services.

(5) A detailed budget and budget narrative.

(6) A description of the proposed plan for parent involvement in the program.

(7) A description of the population anticipated to be served, including number of pupils to be served and socioeconomic indicators of sites to receive funds.

(8) A description of the matching funds from a combination of local education agencies and cooperating entities.

(9) A plan describing how the proposed school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services program will be continued after the matching grant has expired.

(10) Assurance that grants would supplement and not supplant existing local resources provided for early mental health intervention and prevention services.

(11) A description of an evaluation plan that includes quantitative and qualitative measures of school and pupil characteristics, and a comparison of children’s adjustment to school.

(k) Matching grants awarded pursuant to this article may be used for
 salaries of staff responsible for implementing the school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services program, equipment and supplies, training, and insurance.

(l) Salaries of administrative staff and other administrative costs associated with providing services shall be limited to 5 percent of the state share of assistance provided under this section.

(m) No more than 10 percent of each matching grant awarded pursuant to this article may be used for matching grant evaluation.

(n) No more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated to the director pursuant to this chapter may be utilized for program administration and evaluation.

Program administration shall include both state staff and field staff who are familiar with and have successfully implemented
 school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services. Field staff may be contracted with by local school districts or community mental health programs. Field staff shall provide support in the timely and effective implementation of school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services. Reviews of each project shall be conducted at least once during the first year of funding.

(o) Subject to the approval of the director, at the end of the fiscal year, a school district may apply unexpended funds to the budget for the subsequent funding year.

(p) Contracts for the program and administration, or ancillary services in support of the program, shall be exempt from the requirements of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 46.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4381.

No funding shall be made available to any program or facility pursuant to this chapter unless all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The program facility is open to children without regard to any child’s religious beliefs or any other factor related to religion. 

(b) No religious instruction is included in the program. 

(c) The space in which the program is operated is not utilized in any manner to foster religion during the time used for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 757, Sec. 1.   Effective October 9, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4383.

(a) For the 1991–92 and 1992–93 fiscal years, a local schoolsite may be awarded funding from the director pursuant to this part and from the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to the Healthy Start Support Services for Children Act of 1991 (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8800) of Part 6 of the Education Code) if both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The application to the director for funding under this part delineates how the program will coordinate and interface with, and is not duplicative of, the program proposed for funding under the Healthy Start Support Services for Children Act of 1991.

(2) The application to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for funding under the Healthy Start Support Services for Children Act of 1991 delineates how the program will coordinate and interface with, and is not duplicative of, this part.

(b) Up to 20 percent of the schoolsites which receive operational grants from the Healthy Start Support Services for Children program and which apply for grants under this part may receive these grants. The State Department of Mental Health and the State Department of Education shall jointly review the effectiveness of providing both grants to a single schoolsite and make this information available no later than January 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 23, Sec. 2.   Effective April 1, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. School-Based Early Mental Health Intervention and Prevention Services Matching Grant Program Evaluations and Reports [4390. - 4390.]

4390.

The Legislature finds that an evaluation of program effectiveness is both desirable and necessary and accordingly requires the following:

No later than June 30, 1993, and each year thereafter through the term of the grant award, each local education agency that receives a matching grant under this part shall submit a report to the director that shall include the following:

(a) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the local educational agency in achieving stated goals.

(b) A description of the problems encountered in the design and operation of the school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services program, including, but not limited to, identification of any federal, state, or local regulations that impeded program implementation.

(c) The number of eligible pupils served by the program.

(d) The number of additional eligible pupils who have not been served.

(e) An evaluation of the impact of the school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services program on the local educational agency and the children completing the program. The program shall be deemed successful if at least 75 percent of the children who complete the program show an improvement in at least one of the four following areas:

(1) Learning behaviors.

(2) Attendance.

(3) School adjustment.

(4) School-related competencies. Improvement shall be compared with comparable children in that school district that do not complete or participate in the program.

(f) An accounting of local budget savings, if any, resulting from the implementation of the school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services program.

(g) A revised plan of how the proposed school-based early mental health intervention and prevention services program will be continued after the state matching grant has expired, including a list of cooperative entities that will assist in providing the necessary funds and services. Beginning in 1993, this shall, to the extent information is provided by the local mental health department, include a description of the availability of federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396 and following) through a cooperative agreement or contract with the local mental health department. The county office of education may submit the report on the availability of federal financial participation on behalf of the participating local education agencies with the county. In any county in which there is an interagency children’s services coordination council established pursuant to Section 18986.10, a report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted to the council for its review and approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 214.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.1. DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES [4400. - 4499.]



PART 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION, POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT [4400. - 4437.]

4400.

There is in the Health and Welfare Agency a State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4401.

As used in this division:

(a) “Department” means the State Department of Developmental Services.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Developmental Services.

(c) “State hospital” means any hospital specified in Section 4440.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4404.

The department is under the control of an executive officer known as the Director of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4405.

With the consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint to serve at his pleasure, the Director of Developmental Services. He shall have the powers of a head of a department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall receive the salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Upon recommendation of the director, the Governor may appoint a chief deputy director of the department who shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The salary of the chief deputy director shall be fixed in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

4406.

The State Department of Developmental Services succeeds to and is vested with the duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction exercised by the State Department of Health with respect to developmental disabilities on the date immediately prior to the date this section becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4407.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall have possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property real or personal held for the benefit or use of the Director of Health in the performance of his duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction that are vested in the State Department of Developmental Services by Section 4406.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4408.

All officers and employees of the Director of Health who on the operative date of this section are serving in the state civil service, other than as temporary employees, and engaged in the performance of a function vested in the State Department of Developmental Services by Section 4406 shall be transferred to the State Department of Developmental Services. The status, positions, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by them as officers and employees of the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4408.5.

(a) The criminal history check required by this section is limited to a State Department of Developmental Services employee, prospective employee, contractor, subcontractor, and volunteer whose duties include, or would include, access to any of the following:

(1) The developmental center established by Section 7502, the facility described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505, or a program described in Section 4418.7.

(2) An individual receiving services at a developmental center, facility, or program, as they are described in paragraph (1), or a consumer receiving services from a regional center.

(3) Individuals who are being evaluated for placement at a developmental center, facility, or program, as they are described in paragraph (1).

(4) Medical information, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code.

(5) Criminal offender record information, as defined in Section 11075 of the Penal Code, including federal criminal history information obtained pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(b) The State Department of Developmental Services shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of an employee, prospective employee, contractor, subcontractor, and volunteer, specified in subdivision (a), in accordance with subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to authorize the department to receive both state- and federal-level information from the Department of Justice following submission of fingerprints for the purpose of performing background checks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 22.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4409.

All regulations heretofore adopted by the State Department of Health pursuant to authority now vested in the State Department of Developmental Services by Section 4406 and in effect immediately preceding the operative date of this section shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended or repealed by the Director of Developmental Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

4410.

With the approval of the Department of General Services and for use in the furtherance of the work of the State Department of Developmental Services, the director may accept any or all of the following:

(a) Grants of interest in real property.

(b) Grants of money received by this state from the United States, the expenditure of which is administered through or under the direction of any department of this state.

(c) Gifts of money from public agencies or from persons, organizations, or associations interested in scientific, educational, charitable, or mental health fields.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 80.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4411.

The department may expend in accordance with law all money now or hereafter made available for its use, or for the administration of any statute administered by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4412.

The department may expend money in accordance with law for the actual and necessary travel expenses of officers and employees of the department who are authorized to absent themselves from the State of California on official business.

For the purposes of this section and of Sections 11030 and 11032 of the Government Code, the following constitutes, among other purposes, official business for said officers and employees for which such officers and employees shall be allowed actual and necessary traveling expenses when incurred either in or out of this state upon approval of the Governor and Director of Finance:

Attending meetings of any national association or organization having as its principal purpose the study of matters relating to administration of institutions, and care and treatment of developmentally disabled patients; conferring with officers or employees of the United States or other states, relative to problems of institutional care, treatment or management; and obtaining information therefrom, which information would be useful in the conduct of institutional, psychiatric, medical, and similar activities of the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4413.

The department may appoint and fix the compensation of such employees as it deems necessary, subject to the laws governing civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4414.

When convening any task force or advisory group, the department shall make its best effort to ensure representation by consumers and family members representing California’s multicultural diversity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4415.

Except as in this chapter otherwise prescribed, the provisions of the Government Code relating to state officers and departments shall apply to the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4415.5.

(a) The Chief of the Office of Protective Services, who has the responsibility and authority to manage all protective service components within the department’s law enforcement and fire protection divisions, including those at each state developmental center, shall be known as the Director of Protective Services. The director shall be an experienced law enforcement officer with a Peace Officers Standards and Training Management Certificate or higher, and with extensive management experience directing uniformed peace officer and investigation operations.

(b) The Director of Protective Services shall be appointed by, and shall serve at the pleasure of, the Secretary of
 California Health and Human Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 660, Sec. 2.   (SB 1051)   Effective September 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4416.

Unless otherwise indicated in this code, the State Department of Developmental Services has jurisdiction over the execution of the laws relating to the care, custody, and treatment of developmentally disabled persons, as provided in this code.

As used in this division, “establishment” and “institutions” include every hospital, sanitarium, boarding home, or other place receiving or caring for developmentally disabled persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4416.5.

The State Department of Developmental Services may contract with one or more qualified organizations to provide the services required by Section 1919 of the Social Security Act (P.L. 100-203) to persons eligible for those services who are not otherwise within the scope of Division 4.1 (commencing with Section 4400), Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500), Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 7. Contracts entered into pursuant to this section may be awarded on either a competitive bidding basis or on a noncompetitive bidding basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 973, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4417.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services may:

(1) Disseminate educational information relating to the prevention, diagnosis and treatment of persons with intellectual disabilities.

(2) Upon request, advise all public officers, organizations and agencies interested in the developmental disabilities of the people of the state.

(3) Conduct educational and related work that will tend to encourage the development of proper facilities for persons with developmental disabilities throughout the state.

(b) The department may organize, establish, and maintain community mental
 health clinics for the prevention, early diagnosis, and treatment of intellectual disability. These clinics may be maintained only for persons not requiring institutional care, who voluntarily seek the aid of the clinics. These clinics may be maintained at the locations in the communities of the state designated by the director, or at any institution under the jurisdiction of the department designated by the director.

(c) The department may establish rules and regulations that are necessary to carry out this section. This section does not authorize any form of compulsory medical or physical examination, treatment, or control of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 81.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.

The State Department of Developmental Services may obtain psychiatric, medical and other necessary aftercare services for judicially committed patients on leave of absence from state hospitals by contracting with any city, county, local health district, or other public officer or agency, or with any private person or agency to furnish such services to patients in or near the home community of the patient. Any city, county, local health district, or other public officer or agency authorized by law to provide mental health and aftercare services is authorized to enter such contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.05.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide individuals served in facilities operated by the department with prompt access to essential goods and services and provide continuity of care by authorizing direct care purchases.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for facilities operated by the department, the department may make direct care purchases in individual amounts of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year. The dollar amount limit shall be adjusted every July 1 thereafter for that fiscal year by the most recently available changes in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance.

(c) Direct
 care purchases made pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the procurement requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services.

(d) The department shall establish and maintain a written policy and procedures manual to guide the implementation of this section. The manual shall include, but not be limited to, appropriate oversight, internal controls, and the provision of public transparency through the Financial Information System for California (FI$Cal), or other reporting system.

(e) For purposes of this section, “direct care purchase” means a good or service necessary for an individual’s health, safety, or continuity of care. These purchases may include, but are not limited to, prescription and medical copayments, pharmacy supplies, over-the-counter health products, nutritional
 supplements, treatment programs, lodging expenses, groceries and food, clothing, personal hygiene materials, furniture, home goods, educational and technology devices and services for the use of individuals receiving care, and fitness and recreational equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 9.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.2.

The department shall support, utilizing regional resource development projects, the activities specified in Sections 4418.25, 4418.3, and 4418.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 27.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.25.

(a) (1) The department shall establish policies and procedures for the development of an annual community placement plan by regional centers. The community placement plan shall be based upon an individual program plan process as referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 4418.3 and shall be linked to the development of the annual State Budget. The department’s policies shall address statewide priorities, plan requirements, and the statutory roles of regional centers, developmental centers, and regional resource development projects in the process of assessing consumers for community living and in the development of community resources.

(2) (A) In addition to the existing priorities to support the closure of the
 developmental centers and the development of services and supports to transition individuals from restrictive settings, including institutions for mental disease, the department also shall establish guidelines by which community placement plan funds appropriated through the budget process may be utilized for community resource development to address the needs for services and supports of consumers living in the community in accordance with Section 4679.

(B) The department may allocate funds to regional centers for purposes of community resource development as provided in this paragraph when the department determines that sufficient funding has been appropriated and reserved for a fiscal year for development of the resources that are necessary to address the needs of persons moving from a developmental center pursuant to Section 4474.11, and no sooner than 30 days after the department has provided notice of this determination to the Joint
 Legislative Budget Committee and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(b) (1) To reduce reliance on developmental centers and mental health facilities, including institutions for mental disease as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, for which federal funding is not available, and out-of-state placements, the department shall establish a statewide specialized resource service that does all of the following:

(A) Tracks the availability of specialty residential beds and services.

(B) Tracks the availability of specialty clinical services.

(C) Coordinates the need for specialty services and supports in conjunction with regional centers.

(D) Identifies, subject to federal reimbursement, developmental center services and supports that can be made available to consumers residing in the community, when no other community resource has been identified.

(2) By September 1, 2012, regional centers shall provide the department with information about all specialty resources developed with the use of community placement plan funds and shall make these resources available to other regional centers.

(3) When allocating funding for community placement plans, priority shall be given to the development of needed statewide specialty services and supports, including regional community crisis homes.

(4) If approved by the director, funding may be allocated to facilities that meet the criteria of Sections
 1267.75 and 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) The department shall not provide community placement plan funds to develop programs that are ineligible for federal funding participation unless approved by the director.

(c) (1) The community placement plan shall provide for dedicated funding for comprehensive assessments of developmental center residents, for identified costs of moving individuals from developmental centers to the community, and for deflection of individuals from developmental center admission. The plans shall, where appropriate, include budget requests for regional center operations, assessments, resource development, and ongoing placement costs. These budget requests are intended to provide supplemental funding to regional centers. The plan is not intended to limit the department’s or regional centers’ responsibility to otherwise
 conduct assessments and individualized program planning, and to provide needed services and supports in the least restrictive, most integrated setting in accord with the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)).

(2) (A) Regional centers shall complete a comprehensive assessment of a consumer residing in a developmental center on July 1, 2012, who meets both of the following criteria:

(i) The consumer is not committed pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code.

(ii) The consumer has not had such an assessment in the prior two years.

(B) The assessment shall include input from the regional center, the consumer, and, if appropriate, the consumer’s family, legal guardian,
 conservator, or authorized representative, and shall identify the types of community-based services and supports available to the consumer that would enable the consumer to move to a community setting. Necessary services and supports not currently available in the community setting shall be considered for development pursuant to community placement planning and funding.

(C) Regional centers shall specify in the annual community placement plan how they will complete the required assessment and the timeframe for completing the assessment for each consumer. Initial assessments pursuant to this paragraph for individuals residing in a developmental center on July 1, 2012, shall be completed by December 31, 2015, unless a regional center demonstrates to the department that an extension of time is necessary and the department grants such an extension.

(D) The assessment completed in the
 prior two years, or the assessment completed pursuant to the requirements of this section, including any updates pursuant to subparagraph (E), shall be provided to both of the following:

(i) The individual program planning team and clients’ rights advocate for the regional center in order to assist the planning team in determining the least restrictive environment for the consumer.
